Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0105.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3406ss. (1) A health plan or nonprofit dental care corporation operating under 1963 PA 125, MCL 550.351 to 550.373, that provides dental benefits shall provide 1 or more methods of payments or reimbursements that provide the dentist with 100% of the amount payable and do not require the dentist to incur a fee to access the payment or reimbursement. This subsection does not apply to a fee imposed by the dentistâs financial institution. (2) If a dentist opts out of a method of payment under subsection (1), that decision remains in effect until the dentist opts back into the prior payment method or a new contract is executed. (3) As used in this section, âhealth planâ means that term as defined in section 2006. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act applies to dental benefits policies delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state after the effective date of this amendatory act. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor